Maryland, session 2026, SB1002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
26–102.
This title applies only in Prince George’s County.
26–901.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SOCIALLY AND ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED
INDIVIDUAL” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 10A–101 OF THE PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY CODE QUALIFYING ZIP CODE” MEANS A ZIP CODE LOCATED IN PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY IN WHICH THE MEDIAN HOUSEHOLD INCOME, AS DETERMINED
IN THE MOST RECENT DATA PUBLISHED BY THE UNITED STATES CENSUS BUREAU,
DOES NOT EXCEED $86,000.
(B) THERE IS A CLASS AER (EQUITY RETAIL) BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR
LICENSE.
(C) (1) THE LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSE HOLDER TO SELL BEER,
WINE, AND LIQUOR AT RETAIL AT THE PLACE DESCRIBED IN THE LICENSE.
(2) THE LICENSE HOLDER SHALL SELL BEER, WINE, OR LIQUOR IN A
SEALED PACKAGE OR CONTAINER THAT MAY NOT BE OPENED OR ITS CONTENTS
CONSUMED ON THE LICENSED PREMISES.
(D) THE SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SECTION, THE LICENSE
MAY BE ISSUED ONLY:
(1) TO AN APPLICANT THAT IS CERTIFIED AS A MINORITY BUSINESS
ENTERPRISE BY THE COUNTY WHO:
(I) RESIDES IN A QUALIFYING ZIP CODE AT THE TIME OF
APPLICATION; AND
(II) 1. HAS MAINTAINED A PRIMARY RESIDENCE IN ONE OR
MORE QUALIFYING ZIP CODES FOR AT LEAST 4 OF THE 8 YEARS IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING THE DATE OF THE APPLICATION; OR
2. ATTENDED A PRIMARY AND SECONDARY SCHOOL
LOCATED IN ONE OR MORE QUALIFYING ZIP CODES FOR AT LEAST 4 YEARS; AND

SENATE BILL 1002 3
(2) FOR USE AT AN ESTABLISHMENT THAT:
(I) IS LOCATED:
1. OUTSIDE THE CAPITAL BELTWAY; AND
2. AT LEAST 1 ONE–HALF MILE AWAY FROM ANY OTHER
ESTABLISHMENT THAT HOLDS A CLASS A BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE; AND
(II) HAS A MINIMUM CAPITAL INVESTMENT OF $200,000
$500,000 TOWARD THE DEVELOPMENT, ACQUISITION, OR BUILD–OUT OF THE
LICENSED PREMISES; AND
(III) FEATURES AND MAINTAINS A MEANINGFUL INVENTORY OF
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE BRANDS THAT WERE FOUNDED BY, OR ARE UNDER
OWNERSHIP BY A MAJORITY OF, SOCIALLY AND ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED
INDIVIDUALS.
(E) AN ESTABLISHMENT LICENSED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE OWNED
AND UNDER THE OPERATIONAL CONTROL OF A CERTIFIED MINORITY BUSINESS
ENTERPRISE FOR THE DURATION OF THE LICENSE
(1) A LICENSE MAY NOT BE ISSUED TO AN APPLICANT IF:
(I) THE APPLICANT OR A PRINCIPAL OF THE APPLICANT HOLDS
A DIRECT OR INDIRECT OWNERSHIP INTEREST IN ANOTHER CLASS A BEER, WINE,
AND LIQUOR LICENSE IN THE COUNTY, EXCEPT AS AUTHORIZED BY THE BOARD FOR
GOOD CAUSE;
(II) THE APPLICANT IS CONTROLLED BY, AFFILIATED WITH, OR
OPERATED FOR THE BENEFIT OF A CHAIN, FRANCHISE, OR OUTSIDE INVESTMENT
GROUP IN A MANNER THAT UNDERMINES THE PURPOSE OF THIS SECTION; OR
(III) THE APPLICANT FAILS TO DEMONSTRATE ACTUAL
DAY–TO–DAY OPERATIONAL CONTROL OF THE LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL GIVE PRIORITY TO AN APPLICANT THAT:
(I) IS A FIRST–TIME RETAIL LICENSE APPLICANT;
(II) DOES NOT EXCEED REVENUE OR NET–WORTH THRESHOLDS
ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD; AND
(III) DEMONSTRATES A NEED FOR MARKET ENTRY ASSISTANCE.

SENATE BILL 1002
(F) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTIONS (D) AND (E)
OF THIS SECTION, A A LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE ISSUED FOR A
DRUGSTORE UNLESS THE APPLICANT:
(1) HAS BEEN DOING BUSINESS AT THE LOCATION APPLIED FOR IN
THE LICENSE FOR AT LEAST 1 YEAR BEFORE THE DATE OF THE APPLICATION FOR
THE LICENSE;
(2) IS THE ASSIGNEE OF A BUSINESS ESTABLISHED FOR AT LEAST 1
YEAR BEFORE THE DATE OF THE APPLICATION FOR THE LICENSE AT THE LOCATION
APPLIED FOR; OR
(3) HAS BEEN ENGAGED IN THE RETAIL DRUG BUSINESS FOR AT
LEAST 3 YEARS.
(G) THE BOARD MAY NOT ISSUE MORE THAN:
(1) 2 LICENSES UNDER THIS SECTION PER YEAR; AND
(2) A TOTAL OF 10 LICENSES UNDER THIS SECTION.
(H) THE LICENSE HOLDER MAY SELL BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR DURING THE
HOURS AND DAYS AS SET OUT FOR A CLASS A BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE
UNDER § 26–2004 OF THIS TITLE, SUBJECT TO COUNTY USE AND OCCUPANCY LAWS
FOR HOURS OF OPERATION.
(I) THE BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
(J) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEE IS $910.
(K) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE BOARD SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY DELEGATIONS TO THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES AND SENATE OF MARYLAND,
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING INFORMATION REGARDING THE
LOCATION OF EACH LICENSE ISSUED AND THE DEMOGRAPHICS OF EACH LICENSE
HOLDER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.